Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.125

Advisory groups.

The director may establish such advisory groups as in the director's discretion are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Members of and vacancies in such advisory groups shall be filled by appointment by the director. Members shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1985 c 466 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 466: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 466 s 96.]

Severability—1985 c 466: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 466 s 95.]

Headings—1985 c 466: "As used in this act, section headings constitute no part of the law." [ 1985 c 466 s 77.]

Transfer of assets—1985 c 466: "All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of commerce and economic development shall be delivered to the custody of the department of trade and economic development. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce and economic development shall be made available to the department of trade and economic development. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of commerce and economic development shall be assigned to the department of trade and economic development.

Any appropriations made to the department of commerce and economic development shall, June 30, 1985, be transferred and credited to the department of trade and economic development.

Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned." [ 1985 c 466 s 19.]

Transfer of employees—1985 c 466: "All classified employees of the department of commerce and economic development are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of trade and economic development. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of trade and economic development to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service." [ 1985 c 466 s 20.]

Continuation of rules and business and existing contracts and obligations—1985 c 466: "All rules and all pending business before the department of commerce and economic development shall be continued and acted upon by the department of trade and economic development. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of trade and economic development." [ 1985 c 466 s 21.]

Savings—1985 c 466: "The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of commerce and economic development shall not affect the validity of any act performed prior to June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 466 s 22.]

Apportionment of funds—1985 c 466: "If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by sections 19 through 22, chapter 466, Laws of 1985, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification." [ 1985 c 466 s 23.]